Hawaii statutes.
[§708-871.5] False labeling of
Hawaii-grown coffee. (1) A person commits the offense of false labeling
of Hawaii-grown coffee if the person knowingly transports, distributes,
advertises, sells, or possesses with the intent to sell Hawaii-grown green coffee,
cherry coffee, or parchment coffee that is falsely labeled with regard to the
geographic origin of the Hawaii-grown coffee.

(2) For purposes of this section:

"Cherry coffee" means the unprocessed
fruit of the coffee plant.

"Geographic origin" means the
geographic areas designated as follows:

(a) Hamakua is the Hamakua district on the island of
Hawaii, as designated by the State of Hawaii tax map;

(b) Hawaii is the State of Hawaii;

(c) Kau is the Kau district on the island of Hawaii,
as designated by the State of Hawaii tax map;

(d) Kauai is the island of Kauai;

(e) Kona is the north Kona and south Kona districts
on the island of Hawaii, as designated by the State of Hawaii tax map;

(f) Maui is the island of Maui;

(g) Molokai is the island of Molokai; and

(h) Oahu is the island of Oahu.

"Green coffee" means the agricultural
commodity comprised of green coffee beans.

"Parchment coffee" means the dried
product that remains when coffee cherries are processed by removing the coffee
seeds from the pulp.

(3) False labeling of Hawaii-grown coffee is a
class C felony. [L 2012, c 328, §1]

COMMENTARY ON §708-871.5

Act 328, Session Laws 2012, added this section, making
the offense of false labeling of Hawaii-grown coffee with regard to the geographic
origin of the coffee a class C felony. Act 328 provided stronger criminal
penalties to help deter the distribution of Hawaii-grown coffee that was
falsely labeled as to geographic origin. Senate Standing Committee Report No.
3239, Conference Committee Report No. 114-12.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next